Hawaii statutes.
§148-2 Rules and regulations. To carry
out and effectuate the purpose of this part, the department of agriculture may,
subject to chapter 91, establish, prescribe, modify, or alter rules and
regulations, which shall have the force and effect of law to control the
advertisement of fresh fruits, fresh vegetables, or coffee including
requirement for specifying size, grade, geographic origin, or quality, in
conjunction with price.

The department in establishing such rules and
regulations shall consult with appropriate state and federal agencies and with
any appropriate industry or trade organization. The rules and regulations for
controlling advertising and requirements for specifying size, grade, geographic
origin, or quality in conjunction with price shall be on the basis of what the
department may deem best suited to the interest of the consumer, the producer,
and the public. [L 1961, c 73, §2, c 103, and c 132, §2; Supp, §22C-2; HRS
§148-2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next